Wyoming, session 2025, HB0167.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-1-507(a)(viii) and (j)(iv),
16-4-111(d), 18-3-402(d) and 18-3-504(d) are amended to
read:

HB0167

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0491
9-1-507. Examination of books of state institutions,
agencies and certain districts and entities; independent
audit authorized; guidelines.

(a) The director of the state department of audit
shall:

(viii) Beginning 2018, Require each special
district and other entities specified in W.S. 16-12-202(a)
in this state, no matter how formed, except districts
created by and subject to administration by the courts, to
report to the department and to the county clerk of the
county where the special district or other specified entity
is located its proposed budget and adopted budget for the
next fiscal year. The special district or other specified
entity shall post the proposed budget and adopted budget
conspicuously on its website, if the special district or
other specified entity has a website, and shall file the
proposed budget and adopted budget with the county clerk.
If a special district or other specified entity operates in
multiple counties, the special district or other specified
entity may shall post the proposed budget conspicuously on
its website or and file the proposed budget with each
HB0167

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0491
county clerk of the counties in which the special district
or other specified entity operates. The report or posting
of proposed budgets shall be made not later than June 1 of
each year. Adopted budgets shall be provided and posted not
later than thirty (30) days after the budget is adopted.
The format of the reports required by this paragraph shall
be established by the department of audit by rule; no later
than December 31, 2017;

(j) The director of the department of audit shall
certify:

(iv) To the board of county commissioners and to
the special district or entity described in W.S.
16-4-125(c) that receives funding from a municipality as
defined by W.S. 16-4-102(a)(xiv) or other entities
specified in W.S. 16-12-202(a) by October 5 of each year
any special district or other entity in the county, no
matter how formed, that failed to comply with paragraph
(a)(vii) or (a)(viii) of this section. If, by November 30
of that same year, the district or other entity has failed
to comply with paragraph (a)(vii) or (a)(viii) of this
section, the director of the department of audit shall file
HB0167

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0491
notice with the county commissioners, the county treasurer
and the county clerk. The county commissioners shall place
a public notice in a newspaper of general circulation in
the county indicating the special district or other entity
is in danger of being dissolved due to failure to comply
with the legal reporting requirements. The county
commissioners shall assess the special district or other
entity the cost of the public notice. Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, the county treasurer shall withhold
any further disbursements of money to the district or other
entity until the department certifies to the county
treasurer that the district or other entity has complied
with all reporting requirements unless good cause for
noncompliance is shown to the director of the department of
audit as described in W.S. 9-1-510(b). If the special
district or other entity fails to file the required report
on or before December 30 of that same year, the county
commissioners shall seek to dissolve the special district
or other entity in accordance with the process described by
W.S. 22-29-401 et seq. This paragraph shall apply in
addition to any other provision for dissolution in the
principal act for a special district or other entity. The
county treasurer shall certify monthly to the department of
HB0167

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0491
audit, the legislature and the noncompliant district or
entity the amount of disbursements withheld until the
noncompliant district or entity has come into compliance.

16-4-111. Adoption of budget.

(d) As provided by W.S. 39-13-104(k), a copy of the
adopted budget, certified by the budget officer, shall be
furnished to the county commissioners for the necessary
property tax levies. The adopted budget shall include a
report of the revenues and expenditures of the municipality
for the preceding fiscal year. Certified copies of the
adopted budget shall be on file in the office of the budget
officer for public inspection and a copy of the adopted
budget and report shall be posted conspicuously on the
website of the municipality. Copies of school district
budgets shall be furnished to the state department of
education and copies of community college budgets shall be
furnished to the community college commission. This section
also applies to entities described in W.S. 16-4-125(c)
excluding incorporated cities and towns under four thousand
(4,000) inhabitants.

HB0167

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0491
18-3-402. Duties generally.

(d) Each county clerk shall, after receiving a
proposed budget or adopted budget for a special district or
other specified entity under W.S. 9-1-507(a)(viii), ensure
that the proposed budget or adopted budget is forwarded to
the board of county commissioners and county assessor.

18-3-504. Powers and duties generally.

(d) Each board of county commissioners shall, after
receiving a proposed budget for a special district or other
specified entity under W.S. 18-3-402(d), ensure that the
proposed budget is posted on the appropriate area of the
website of the county. The posting of the budget shall
include the date, time and location of a special district
budget session during which final action will be taken on
the proposed budget. If a proposed budget is not provided
to the county clerk as required by W.S. 9-1-507(a), the
board of county commissioners may shall not approve funding
of the special district mill levy. Upon approval of the
mill levy for each special district, the final approved
budget shall be posted on the appropriate area of the
HB0167

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0491
website of the county along with the final approved county
budget as provided in W.S. 16-4-111(d).

Section 2. Each local governmental entity that is
subject to W.S. 9-1-507, 16-4-111, 18-3-402 or 18-3-504 as
amended by section 1 of this act shall, to the extent
required by those sections, post the adopted budgets to the
website of the entity for not less than the five (5) most
recent fiscal years.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0167